Vermont, session 2025-2026, H439.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 700 is added to read:
§ 700. VERMONT WHOLE HOME REPAIRS PROGRAM
(a) Creation of Program.
(1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
design and implement the Vermont Whole Home Repairs Program, through
which the Department shall award funding to statewide or regional nonprofit
housing organizations, or both, to provide competitive grants and forgivable
VT LEG #381052 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.439
2025 Page 2 of 7
loans to homeowners and private landlords to address habitability concerns
within a residential dwelling unit, including energy or water efficiency or to
make the dwelling accessible for individuals with disabilities.
(2) The Department shall develop statewide standards for the Program,
including factors that partner organizations shall use to evaluate applications
and award grants and forgivable loans.
(3) A landlord shall not offer a unit created through the Program as a
short-term rental, as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4301, for the period a grant or loan
agreement is in effect.
(4) The Department may utilize a reasonable percentage, up to a cap of
five percent, of appropriations made to the Department for the Program to
administer the Program.
(5) The Department may cooperate with and subgrant funds to State
agencies and governmental subdivisions and public and private organizations
in order to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
(b) Administration.
(1) The Department shall require a housing organization that receives
funding under the Program to adopt:
(A) a standard application form that describes the application process
and includes instructions and examples to help landlords apply;
VT LEG #381052 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.439
2025 Page 3 of 7
(B) an award process that ensures equitable selection of landlords,
subject to a housing organization’s exercise of discretion based on the factors
adopted by the Department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section;
(C) a grant and loan management system that ensures accountability
for funds awarded and provides effective outcome reporting for Program
evaluation;
(D) technical assistance and case management services for
homeowners, renters, and landlords, including the ability to coordinate across
existing home repair programs; and
(E) a referral program, where appropriate, to an organization
providing legal services to individuals with low-income; a designated or
specialized service agency; or a medical or social service provider serving
individuals with low-income.
(2) Housing organizations that receive funding under this Program shall
partner with employers and organizations that administer workforce
development programs that will connect trainees to jobs through committed
employer partnerships related to improving the habitability and performance of
homes that may include:
(A) cash stipends for trainees; and
(B) costs related to the design and implementation of pre-
apprenticeship, apprenticeship, and on-the-job training programs.
VT LEG #381052 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.439
2025 Page 4 of 7
(c) Program requirements applicable to grants and loans.
(1)(A) A grant or loan shall not exceed $50,000.00 per unit for
addressing habitability concerns, to improve energy or water efficiency, or to
make the dwelling accessible for individuals with disabilities.
(B) As used in this section, “habitability concerns” means home
repairs that are required to ensure a residential dwelling unit is:
(i) fit for human habitation;
(ii) free from defective conditions or health and safety hazards,
including asbestos, mold, pests, or lead; or
(iii) free from conditions preventing installation of measurers to
improve energy or water efficiency and lower utility costs.
(2) If the unit is occupied, the grant or forgivable loan agreement shall
include terms:
(A) that prohibit permanent, involuntary displacement of the current
residents;
(B) that provide for the temporary relocation of the current residents
if necessary to perform the rehabilitation; and
(C) that ensure that the landlord complies with the affordability
requirements of the Program following the rehabilitation.
(3) In determining the amount of a grant or loan, a housing organization
shall consider the number of bedrooms in the unit, whether the unit is being
VT LEG #381052 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.439
2025 Page 5 of 7
rehabilitated or newly created, whether the project includes accessibility
improvements, and whether the unit is being converted from nonresidential to
residential purposes.
(4) A landlord shall contribute matching funds or in-kind services that
equal or exceed 20 percent of the value of the grant or loan.
(5) A project may include a weatherization component.
(6) A project shall comply with applicable building, housing, and health
laws.
(7) The terms and conditions of a grant or loan agreement apply to the
original recipient and to a successor in interest for the period the grant or loan
agreement is in effect.
(8) The identity of a recipient, the amount of a grant or forgivable loan,
the year in which the grant or forgivable loan was extended, and the year in
which any affordability covenant ends are public records that shall be available
for public copying and inspection and the Department shall publish this
information at least quarterly on its website.
(9) A project for rehabilitation or creation of an accessible unit may
apply funds to the creation of a parking spot for individuals with disabilities.
(d) Funding awards.
(1) A homeowner whose household income does not exceed 80 percent
of the area median income shall be eligible for a grant.
VT LEG #381052 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.439
2025 Page 6 of 7
(2)(A) A landlord shall be eligible for a forgivable loan if the following
conditions have been met:
(i) The landlord offers to extend a current residential rental
agreement to the resident occupying the unit for a period of up to three years.
(ii) Annual increases in monthly rent have not exceeded three
percent of the base rent or the unit has been occupied by a tenant receiving any
housing voucher or similar federal or State subsidy for a period of not less than
10 years.
(iii) The landlord has not committed a serious violation with
regards to the landlord’s rental property for which the landlord has taken no
substantial steps to correct the serious violation within six months following
notification of the serious violation and for which no fines or other penalties or
a judgement to correct were imposed by a judge or municipal housing
authority, nor a judgement at law or in equity was imposed within the past 10
years.
(iv) The landlord has maintained ownership of the unit for a
period of not less than 10 years.
(B) As used in this subsection (d) a “serious violation” means a
violation of State law or municipal ordinance that poses an imminent threat to
the health and safety of a dwelling occupant, occupants in surrounding
structures, or the public.
VT LEG #381052 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.439
2025 Page 7 of 7
(3) A homeowner or landlord who does not meet the requirements of
subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall be eligible for a loan subject to
the requirements of this section.
(e) Lien priority. A lien for a grant converted to a loan or for a forgivable
loan issued pursuant to this section is subordinate to:
(1) a lien on the property in existence at the time the lien for
rehabilitation and weatherization of the rental housing unit is filed in the land
records; and
(2) a first mortgage on the property that is refinanced and recorded after
the lien for rehabilitation and weatherization of the rental housing unit is filed
in the land records.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION
The sum of $15,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development in fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of funding the Whole Home Repairs Program established in 10
V.S.A. § 700, $5,000,000.00 of which shall be used for technical assistance
and workforce development.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381052 v.1